Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
REGISTRATION AND RECOGNITION OF ORDERS FROM

OTHER STATES

Note

Part applies to proceedings begun before September 1, 2014,
regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued. L
2012, c 236, §2.

[§551G-31] Registration of guardianship
orders. If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition
for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in the State of Hawaii, the
guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing
court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in the
State of Hawaii by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate
judicial circuit of the State of Hawaii, certified copies of the order and
letters of office. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next